Utah statutes.
78B-15-409.   Search of records -- Certificate.

(1)  Upon the request of an individual, tribunal, or agency identified in Section 78B-15-405, the Office of Vital Records shall search its records for any registration made pursuant to Section 78B-15-401 and furnish to the requestor a certificate of search which shall be signed on behalf of the office and state that:

(a)  a search has been made of the records of the Office of Vital Records; and

(b)  a registration containing the information required to identify the registrant:

(i)  has been found and is attached to the certificate of search; or

(ii)  has not been found.

(2)  A petitioner shall file the certificate of search with the tribunal in connection with a proceeding for adoption.

